anl/cwd_vs_crk/cwd_verb_affixes.lexc
LEXICON VTIm_IND_NI
VTIm_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>n2 VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_KI
VTIm_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX
+2Sg:%>n2 VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX
+12Pl:%>n2aw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>n2ânaw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_NULL
VTIm_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>m VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Der/X:%>ikâtê VIIn_SG ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>mwak VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>mithiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Der/X:%>ikâtê VIIn_PL ;
LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_NULL
VTIm_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>mân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>man VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>hk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+3Sg:%>mihk VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>mâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>mahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>mîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>hkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>mithit VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IMP_NULL
VTIm_IMP_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IMP_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg:%>0   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg:%>mohkan   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+12Pl:%>tân	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>mok	 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl:%>mohkahk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl:%>mohkîk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL
VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>mâni VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>mani VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>hki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>mihki VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>mâhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>mahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>mahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>mîko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>hkwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>mithici VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA
+V+TA:0 VTA_WICI ;
LEXICON VTA_PL
+V+TA:0 VTA_PL_WICI ;
LEXICON VTAt
+V+TA:0 VTAt_WICI ;
LEXICON VTAi
+V+TA:0 VTAi_WICI ;
LEXICON VTA_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTA_ORDER ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTA_PL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VTAt_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTAt_ORDER ;
LEXICON VTAi_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTAi_ORDER ;
LEXICON VTA_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTA_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTA_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTA_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTA_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTA_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTA_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTA_PL_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTA_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTAi_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTA_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTA_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTAi_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTA_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTAt_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTA_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTA_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTAt_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTA_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTA_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTA_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VTA_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTA_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTA_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTA_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTA_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTA_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTA_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VTA_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTA_PL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTA_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTA_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTA_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VTA_IND_NI ;
@U.person.KI@ VTA_IND_KI ;
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_IND_NULL ;
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_CNJ_NULL ;
LEXICON VTA_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_FUT_CON_NULL ;
LEXICON VTA_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_IMP_NULL ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VTA_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.KI@ VTA_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_PL_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTA_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTAt_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTAt_IMP_NULL ;
LEXICON VTAi_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTAi_IMP_NULL ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_NI
VTA_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTA_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâwa	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>i2k        VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2kothiwa	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawin   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2kon   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX
+1Sg+3PlO:%>âwak	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>ânân	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>ânânak	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mânâna	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2konân	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>i2kwak	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2konânak  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2konâna	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawinân   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2konân	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_KI
VTA_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTA_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX
+2Sg+1SgO:%>in         VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâwa	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2tin         VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2k		  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2kothiwa	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawin   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2kon	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX
+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>inâwâw     VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>âwak VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âwâw	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âwâwak	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâwâwa	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>ânaw	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>ânawak	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mânawa	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2tinâwâw         VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2tinân         VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2tinân         VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>i2konaw	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2kowâw	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2kwak	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+12PlO:%>i2konawak VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2kowâwak  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:%>i2konawa	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2kowâwa	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+12PlO:%>i2kawinânaw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+12PlO:%>i2kawinaw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawinâwâw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+12PlO:%>i2konaw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2kowâw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_NULL
VTA_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTA_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>îw		  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mîw		  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>îthiwa	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2k	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2kow	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2kothiwa	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+3SgO:%>âw   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>âthiwa   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2kow	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2kothiwa	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>îwak	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mîwak	VERB_ENDLEX ;	
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kwak	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kowak	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+3PlO:%>âwak   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kowak	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_NULL
VTA_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTA_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+2Sg+1SgO:%>iyan       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>ak	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>at	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mak	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mat	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>ât	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>âthit      VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mât	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2tân         VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>it		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2sk		   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2mit	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2misk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2kot	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2kothit	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawiyân	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawiyan	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+3SgO:%>i2ht	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>i2miht	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+2Sg+1PlO:%>iyâhk       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>iyâhk       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>iyîk       VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>akwâw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East:%>aki	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>acik	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East:%>akiht	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>akihcik	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>âyahk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East:%>ahk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>âyahkwâw   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>ahkwâw   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âyîk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âyîkwâw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>âyîkok	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyâhk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyahk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyîk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>âcik      VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mâcik      VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2tâhk         VERB_ENDLEX ; 
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2tâhk         VERB_ENDLEX ; 
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2takwâw         VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>icik	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>itwâw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2skwâw	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2koyâhk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East:%>iyamiht	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhkwâw  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East:%>iyamihcik  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>i2koyahk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East:%>i2tahk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+12PlO:%>i2koyahkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East:%>i2tahkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2koyîk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East:%>i2tîk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyîkwâw   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East:%>i2tîkwâw   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:%>i2koyahk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyîk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kocik	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawiyâhk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+12PlO:%>i2kawiyahk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawiyîk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+3PlO:%>i2hcik	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2koyân	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2koyan	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2kot	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+12PlO:%>i2koyahk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyîk	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kocik	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2kothit	   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_IMP_NULL
VTA_IMP_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTA_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTA_IMP_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2hkan VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:0 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTA_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>ik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2hkîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:%>âtân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2hk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2hkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>ik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>âhkanik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkîkwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East:%>âhkik VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTAt_IMP_NULL
VTAt_IMP_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VTAt_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTAt_IMP_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2hkan VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:0 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan VERB_ENDLEX ;
